test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kiainu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - kuávská:
    kuávská+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávˊská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávskán
    kuávská+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávskást
    kuávská+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊskáin
    kuávská+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvskáttáá
    kuávská+N+Ess:  kuávˊskán
    kuávská+N+Par:  kuávˊskád
    kuávská+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávskáh
    kuávská+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávskái, kuáˊvskái]
    kuávská+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávskáin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvskáiguin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvskáittáá

  Noun - kuáhčá:
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáhˊčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávčást
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊččáin
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvčáttáá
    kuáhčá+N+Ess:  kuáhˊčán
    kuáhčá+N+Par:  kuáhˊčád
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávčáh
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávčái, kuáˊvčái]
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávčáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊččáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávčáin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvčáiguin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvčáittáá

  Noun - kiälkká:
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Nom:  kiälˊkká
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Gen:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Acc:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Ill:  kiälkán
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Loc:  kiälhást
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Com:  kiälˊháin
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊlháttáá
    kiälkká+N+Ess:  kiälˊkkán
    kiälkká+N+Par:  kiälˊkkád
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Nom:  kiälháh
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Gen: [kiälhái, kiäˊlhái]
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Acc:  kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Ill:  kiälˊháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Loc:  kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊlháiguin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊlháittáá

  Noun - miärkká:
    miärkká+N+Sg+Nom:  miärˊkká
    miärkká+N+Sg+Gen:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Acc:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Ill:  miärkán
    miärkká+N+Sg+Loc:  miärhást
    miärkká+N+Sg+Com:  miärˊháin
    miärkká+N+Sg+Abe:  miäˊrháttáá
    miärkká+N+Ess:  miärˊkkán
    miärkká+N+Par:  miärˊkkád
    miärkká+N+Pl+Nom:  miärháh
    miärkká+N+Pl+Gen: [miärhái, miäˊrhái]
    miärkká+N+Pl+Acc:  miärháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Ill:  miärˊháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Loc:  miärháin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Com:  miäˊrháiguin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Abe:  miäˊrháittáá

  Noun - riävská:
    riävská+N+Sg+Nom:  riävˊská
    riävská+N+Sg+Gen:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Acc:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Ill:  riävskán
    riävská+N+Sg+Loc:  riävskást
    riävská+N+Sg+Com:  riävˊskáin
    riävská+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊvskáttáá
    riävská+N+Ess:  riävˊskán
    riävská+N+Par:  riävˊskád
    riävská+N+Pl+Nom:  riävskáh
    riävská+N+Pl+Gen: [riävskái, riäˊvskái]
    riävská+N+Pl+Acc:  riävskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Ill:  riävˊskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Loc:  riävskáin
    riävská+N+Pl+Com:  riäˊvskáiguin
    riävská+N+Pl+Abe:  riäˊvskáittáá

  Noun - riätká:
    riätká+N+Sg+Nom:  riätˊká
    riätká+N+Sg+Gen:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Acc:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Ill:  riätkán
    riätká+N+Sg+Loc:  riäđhást
    riätká+N+Sg+Com:  riäđˊháin
    riätká+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊđháttáá
    riätká+N+Ess:  riätˊkán
    riätká+N+Par:  riätˊkád
    riätká+N+Pl+Nom:  riäđháh
    riätká+N+Pl+Gen: [riäđhái, riäˊđhái]
    riätká+N+Pl+Acc:  riäđháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Ill:  riäđˊháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Loc:  riäđháin
    riätká+N+Pl+Com:  riäˊđháiguin
    riätká+N+Pl+Abe:  riäˊđháittáá

  Noun - vuástá:
    vuástá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuásˊtá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuástán
    vuástá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuástást
    vuástá+N+Sg+Com:  vuásˊtáin
    vuástá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊstáttáá
    vuástá+N+Ess:  vuásˊtán
    vuástá+N+Par:  vuásˊtád
    vuástá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuástáh
    vuástá+N+Pl+Gen: [vuástái, vuáˊstái]
    vuástá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuástáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuásˊtáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuástáin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊstáiguin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊstáittáá

  Noun - čiähá:
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom:  čiähá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen:  čiäṿá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Acc:  čiäṿá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill:  čiähán
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc:  čiäṿást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com:  čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Sg+Abe:  čiäˊṿáttáá
    čiähá+N+Ess:  čiähán
    čiähá+N+Par: čiähád
    čiähá+N+Pl+Nom:  čiäṿáh
    čiähá+N+Pl+Gen: [čiäṿái, čiäˊṿái]
    čiähá+N+Pl+Acc:  čiäṿáid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Ill:  čiävváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Loc:  čiäṿáin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Com:  čiäˊṿáiguin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe:  čiäˊṿáittáá


  Noun - kuáddá:
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuádˊdá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Acc: kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuádán
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuádást
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Com:  kuádˊdáin
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊdáttáá
    kuáddá+N+Ess:  kuádˊdán
    kuáddá+N+Par: kuádˊdád
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuádáh
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Gen: [kuádái, kuáˊdái]
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuádáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuádˊdáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuádáin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊdáiguin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊdáittáá

  Noun - puánnjá:
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Nom:  puánˊnjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Gen:  puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Acc: puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Ill:  puánján
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Loc:  puánjást
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Com:  puánˊnjáin
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊnjáttáá
    puánnjá+N+Ess:  puánˊnján
    puánnjá+N+Par: puánˊnjád
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Nom:  puánjáh
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Gen: [puánjái, puáˊnjái]
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Acc:  puánjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Ill:  puánˊnjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Loc:  puánjáin
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊnjáiguin
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊnjáittáá
